District of Columbia statutes.
2-1325

Appointments to vacancies.

When a vacancy develops on the Commission, the Mayor shall appoint a successor, with the advice and consent of the Council, to complete the unexpired term.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 405, 23 DCR 2543
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 5(b), 29 DCR 458

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2325.
1973 Ed., § 6-1925.

Prior Codifications